Utah statutes.
35A-4-406.   Claims for benefits -- Continuing jurisdiction -- Appeal --
Notice of decision -- Repayment of benefits fraudulently received.
(1) (a)  Claims for benefits shall be made and shall be determined by the
division or referred to an administrative law judge in accordance with rules
adopted by the department.
(b)  Each employer shall post and maintain in places readily accessible to
individuals in his service printed statements concerning benefit rights,
claims for benefits, and the other matters relating to the administration of
this chapter as prescribed by rule of the department.
(c)  Each employer shall supply to individuals in his service copies of the
printed statements or other materials relating to claims for benefits when and
as the department may by rule prescribe.  The printed statements and other
materials shall be supplied by the division to each employer without cost to
the employer.
(2) (a)  Jurisdiction over benefits shall be continuous.
(b)  Upon its own initiative or upon application of any party affected, the
division may on the basis of change in conditions or because of a mistake as
to facts, review a decision allowing or disallowing in whole or in part a
claim for benefits.
(c)  The review shall be conducted in accordance with rules adopted by the
department and may result in a new decision that may award, terminate,
continue, increase, or decrease benefits, or may result in a referral of the
claim to an appeal tribunal.
(d)  Notice of any redetermination shall be promptly given to the party
applying for redetermination and to other parties entitled to notice of the
original determination, in the manner prescribed in this section with respect
to notice of an original determination.
(e)  The new order shall be subject to review and appeal as provided in this
section.
(f)  A review may not be made after one year from the date of the original
determination, except in cases of fraud or claimant fault as provided in
Subsection (4).
(3) (a)  The claimant or any other party entitled to notice of a determination
as provided by department rule may file an appeal from the determination with
the Division of Adjudication within ten days after the date of mailing of the
notice of determination or redetermination to the party's last-known address
or, if the notice is not mailed, within ten days after the date of delivery of
the notice.
(b)  Unless the appeal or referral is withdrawn with  permission of the
administrative law judge, after affording the parties reasonable opportunity
for a fair hearing, the administrative law judge shall make findings and
conclusions and on that basis affirm, modify, or reverse the determination or
redetermination.
(c)  The administrative law judge shall first give notice of the pendency of
an appeal to the  division, which may then be a party to the proceedings.  The
administrative law judge shall receive into the record of the appeal any
documents or other records provided by the division, and may obtain or request
any additional documents or records held by the division or any of the parties
that the administrative law judge considers relevant to the proper
determination of the appeal.
(d)  The parties shall be promptly notified of the administrative law judge's
decision and shall be furnished with a copy of the decision and the findings
and conclusions in support of the decision.
(e)  The decision is considered to be final unless, within 30 days after the
date of mailing of notice and a copy of the decision to the party's last-known
address, or in the absence of mailed notice, within 30 days after the delivery
of the notice, further appeal is initiated in accordance with Section
35A-4-508 and Chapter 1, Part 3, Adjudicative Proceedings.
(4) (a)  Any person who, by reason of his fraud, has received any sum as
benefits under this chapter to which he was not entitled shall repay the sum
to the division for the fund.
(b)  If any person, by reason of his own fault, has received any sum as
benefits under this chapter to which under a redetermination or decision
pursuant to this section he has been found not entitled, he shall repay the
sum, or shall, in the discretion of the division, have the sum deducted from
any future benefits payable to him, or both.
(c)  In any case in which under this subsection a claimant is liable to repay
to the division any sum for the fund, the sum shall be collectible in the same
manner as provided for contributions due under this chapter.
(5) (a)  If any person has received any sum as benefits under this chapter to
which under a redetermination or decision he was not entitled, and it has been
found that he was without fault in the matter, he is not liable to repay the
sum but shall be liable to have the sum deducted from any future benefits
payable to him.
(b)  The division may waive recovery of the overpayment if it is shown to the
satisfaction of the division that the claimant has the inability to meet more
than the basic needs of survival for an indefinite period lasting at least
several months.
